New Jersey, session 222, A2919.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    There shall be deposited in the New Jersey Wine Promotion Account, established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1985, c.233 (C.4:10-76), the amount collected from all fees established in subsections 2a. through 2e. of R.S.33:1-10 for the first five years following the effective date of this act. The monies shall be appropriated annually for a period of five years to the Department of Agriculture for deposit in the account to be used by the New Jersey Wine Industry Advisory Council to award grants for wine industry projects that address research, development, and promotion of the New Jersey wine industry. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following enactment.